Hawaii statutes.
§412:5-404 Termination of authority of
intra-Pacific bank. The authority of any intra-Pacific bank to engage in
the business of a bank in this State pursuant to this part shall automatically
terminate at such time as it no longer meets the definition of an intra-Pacific
bank under section 412:5-400. In such case it shall:

(1) Immediately notify the commissioner of that
circumstance;

(2) Cease accepting deposits in this State, and cease
making loans and investments in this State;

(3) Within thirty days, adopt a plan for the orderly
liquidation of its assets, or its orderly divestiture pursuant to this chapter,
and submit such plan to the commissioner; and

(4) Take such other measures and actions as shall be
directed by the commissioner. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next